Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,264
Violation by common carrier; permit revoked or suspended.

In case of any violation of section 60-6,263 by any common carrier or person operating a motor vehicle under a permit issued by the Director of Motor Vehicles, the Public Service Commission, or any other authorized body or officer, such permit shall be revoked or, in the discretion of such authorized department, commission, body, or officer, suspended until the provisions of such section are satisfactorily complied with.

Laws 1933, c. 101, § 6, p. 414;

Laws 1937, c. 145, § 6, p. 556;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 39-1199;

R.S.1943, § 39-7,106;

Laws 1957, c. 366, § 20, p. 1258;

Laws 1972, LB 1058, § 7;

R.S.Supp.,1972, § 39-7,106;

Laws 1987, LB 224, § 10;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,160;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 360.